dictionaries/so_SO/so_SO.aff
# so_SO.aff - affix file for myspell-so
#
#   This program is free software; you can redistribute it and/or modify
#   it under the terms of the GNU General Public License as published by
#   the Free Software Foundation; either version 2 of the License, or
#   (at your option) any later version.
#
#   This program is distributed in the hope that it will be useful,
#   but WITHOUT ANY WARRANTY; without even the implied warranty of
#   MERCHANTABILITY or FITNESS FOR A PARTICULAR PURPOSE.  See the
#   GNU General Public License for more details.
#
#   You should have received a copy of the GNU General Public License
#   along with this program; if not, write to the Free Software
#   Foundation, Inc., 51 Franklin St, Fifth Floor, Boston, MA 02110-1301, USA.
#
#   Mohamed I. Mursal   mimursal (at) gmail.com
#   Version 0.1 06.2009
SET UTF-8
TRY aiodynueklhsrgmwbxtqcfjSMWCDIAGHBKXQJ'-LNYTRPUF/EOpz
NOSPLITSUGS
# ordinal numbers 
COMPOUNDMIN 1
# only in compounds: 1th, 2th, 3th
ONLYINCOMPOUND _
# compound rules:
# 1. [0-9]*1[0-9]th (10th, 11th, 12th, 56714th, etc.)
# 2. [0-9]*[02-9](1aad|2aad|3rd|[4-9]th) (21st, 22nd, 123rd, 1234th, etc.)
COMPOUNDRULE 2
COMPOUNDRULE #*0{
COMPOUNDRULE #*@}
WORDCHARS 0123456789-'
FLAGCHAR /
#yaysay yaysay nayseenyeen ducee samee
SFX A Y 29
SFX A   0     s         [bjxdrcfhlmwi]i #baafis, buuxis, nadiifis, gaabis
SFX A   0     n         [bjxdrcfhlmwi]i #baafin, buuxin, nadiifin, gaabin
SFX A   0     ya        [bjxdrcfhlmwi]i #amar jamac ah
SFX A   0     yay       [bjxdrcfhlmwi]i #kordhi, kordhiyay
SFX A   0     yo        [bjxdrcfhlwi]i  #shuruud aniga
SFX A   0     a         eey   #amar afeey -> afeeya, adkeey -> adkeeya
SFX A   0     s         eey   #afeey -> afeeys, adkeey -> adkeeys
SFX A   0     ay        eey   #afeeyay
SFX A   0     o         eey   #afeeyo shuruud aniga
SFX A   ey    ysay      eey   #afeey->afeysay, dhaweey->dhaweysay
SFX A   ey    ysid       eey   #afeysid shuruud adiga
SFX A   ey    yso       eey   #afeeyo shuruud ayada
SFX A   ey    ynay      eey   #fogeey->fogeynay
SFX A   ey    yno       eey   #afeyno shuruud anaga
SFX A   0     seen      eey
SFX A   ey    ysiin     eey   #afeeyo shuruud idinka, Koonfur
SFX A   0     saan      eey   #afeeyo shuruud idinka, Woqooyi
SFX A   0     een       eey
SFX A   0     aan       eey   #afeeyo shuruud aniga
SFX A   0     nin       eey   # Diidmo sharuudeed, Hadii aadan afeeynin
SFX A   0     say       [bjxdrcfhlmwi]i
SFX A   0     sid       [bjxdrcfhlmwi]i     #shuruud adiga
SFX A   0     so        [bjxdrcfhlmwi]i     #shuruud ayada
SFX A   0     nay       [bjxdrcfhlmwi]i
SFX A   0     no        [bjxdrcfhlmwi]i     #shuruud anaga
SFX A   0     seen      [bjxdrcfhlmwi]i
SFX A   0     siin      [bjxdrcfhlmwi]i     #shuruud idinka
SFX A   0     yeen      [bjxdrcfhlmwi]i
SFX A   0     yaan      [bjxdrcfhlmwi]i     #shuruud ayaga
#aytay aytay nayteeneen  cayaar sabar dabar bar?? dalab dhaawacan dhaawacmay dareen dareemay
SFX B Y 29
SFX B   0     is        [bgmr]        # Dhiibis, dir->diris
SFX B   0     id        [s]        # tus->tisod, dir->diris
SFX B   0     a         .       # amar jamac ah
SFX B   ar    ra        [bf]ar  # amar jamac ah
SFX B   0     ay        .       #
SFX B   0     o         .        #Sharuud Aniga iyo Asaga
SFX B   ar    ro        [bfg]ar       #Sharuud Aniga iyo Asaga hagar->hagro
SFX B   an    may       an
SFX B   n     may       een
SFX B   ar    ray       [bfg]ar  #??
SFX B   0     tay       .
SFX B   m     ntay      m       #tilmaam ->tilmaamay->tilmaantay
SFX B   0     to        .        #Shuruud-W Adiga iyo Ayada
SFX B   m     nto       m        #Shuruud-W Adiga iyo Ayada tilmaam->tilmaanto
SFX B   0     tid       .        #Shuruud-K Adiga
SFX B   m     ntid      m        #Shuruud-K Adiga tilmaam->tilmaantid
SFX B   0     nay       .
SFX B   0     no        .        #Shuruud Anga 
SFX B   m     no        m        #Shuruud Anga tilmaam->tilmaano
SFX B   0     teen      .       #??
SFX B   0     een       .       #??
SFX B   ar    reen      [bfg]ar  #??
SFX B   ab    been      lab   #??
SFX B   0     tiin      .        #Shuruud Idinka: Hadaad u yeertiin, koonfur
SFX B   0     taan      .        #Shuruud Idinka: Hadaad u yeertaan, woqooyi
SFX B   an    meen      an
SFX B   n     meen      een
SFX B   0     aan       .        #Shuruud Ayaga
SFX B   0     in        .        #Shuruud diidmo
#ay-day-ay-day-nay-deen-een       
SFX b Y 16
SFX b   0     is        .   # horkac->horkacis, garaac->garaacis (daboolid?? galid??)
SFX b   0     a         .   #amar jamac ah
SFX b   0     ista      .   #horkac -> horkacista
SFX b   0     ay        .   #Aniga: horkac->horkacay
SFX b   0     day       .   #Adiga: horkac->horkacday 
SFX b   0     nay       .
SFX b   0     deen      .   #horkac->horkacdeen
SFX b   0     een       .
SFX b   0     o         .   #shuruud
SFX b   0     do        .   #shuruud-W
SFX b   0     did       .   #shuruud-K
SFX b   0     no        .   #shuruud
SFX b   0     diin      .   #shuruud-K
SFX b   0     daan      .   #shuruud-W
SFX b   0     aan       .   #shuruud
SFX b   0     in        .   #shuruud  Diidmo, garaac->hadii aanan garaacin
# ay-shay-ay-shay-nay-sheen-een o-shid-o-sho  -no-laan-shaan     
SFX c Y 16
SFX c   0     a         .   #amar jamac ah
SFX c   0     is        .   # aqbal->aqbalis
SFX c   0     id        .   # aqbal->aqbalid
SFX c   0     ay        .   # anigaa aqbalay
SFX c   l     shay      l   #aqbal-> aqbashay (adigaa)
SFX c   0     nay       .   #aqbal->aqbalnay
SFX c   l     sheen     l   #aqbal->aqbalnay
SFX c   0     een       .
SFX c   0     o         .   #shuruud    bedel->bedelo
SFX c   l     shid      l   #shuruud
SFX c   l     sho       l   #shuruud
SFX c   0     no        .   #shuruud
SFX c   l     shiin     l   #shuruud-K
SFX c   l     shaan     l   #shuruud-W
SFX c   0     aan       .   #shuruud
SFX c   0     in        .   #shuruud    diidmo aqbalin
#ayday ayday naydeeneen         
SFX C Y 22
SFX C   0     is       [q]     # dhawaaq->dhawaaqis
SFX C   0     id       [x]     # maslax->maslixid
SFX C   ac    icis     ac     # bixis, fasaxid
SFX C   ax    ixis     bax     # bixis, fasaxid
SFX C   0     a        .       #amar jamac ah
SFX C   0     ay       .
SFX C   ac    cay      mac
SFX C   0     day      .
SFX C   0     nay      .
SFX C   0     deen     .
SFX C   0     een      .
SFX C   ac    ceen     mac
SFX C   0     o        .   #shuruud
SFX C   0     did      [^d]   #shuruud
SFX C   0     id       [d]   #shuruud
SFX C   0     do       .   #shuruud
SFX C   0     no       .   #shuruud
SFX C   0     diin     [^d]   #Shuruud Idinka: Hadaad ku gowracdiin, koonfur
SFX C   0     iin      [d]   #Shuruud Idinka: Hadaad ku gowracdiin, koonfur
SFX C   0     daan     .   #Shuruud Idinka: Hadaad ku dhawaaqdaan, woqooyi
SFX C   0     aan      .   #shuruud
SFX C   0     in       .   #shuruud diidmo
#diid diiday wad waday qaad qaaday      
SFX d Y 5
SFX d   0     is        [aeiou]d    #qaadis, wadis, diidis
SFX d   0     a         [aeiou]d    #amar jamac ah
SFX d   0     ay        [aeiou]d
SFX d   0     nay       [aeiou]d
SFX d   0     een       [aeiou]d
#baaqeyga qufaceeda qufaceena
SFX E Y 15
SFX E   0     eyga     . #mashruuc -> mashruuceyga
SFX E   0     aada     . #Koonfur
SFX E   0     aaga     . #Woqooyi
SFX E   0     iisa     .
SFX E   0     eeda     .
SFX E   0     eena     .
SFX E   0     iina     .
SFX E   0     ooda     .
SFX E   0     a        .
SFX E   0     an       . #mashruuc-Amashuucan
SFX E   0     ee       . #mashruuc->mashruucee
SFX E   0     ii       .
SFX E   0     aas      .
SFX E   0     aan      .
SFX E   0     yada     .
