dictionaries/so_SO/so_SO.dic
aamin/B
aas/B
abuur/B
adeeg/B
adeeji/A
adkeey/A
afduub/B
afeey/A
akhri/A
amar/BK
anfac/E
ansixi/A
aqbal/cK
aqri/A
argagax/C
aruuri/A
baad/d
baafi/AT
baahi/A
baaq/E
baar/B
badbaadi/AT
badi/A
ballac/E
bandhig/BG
bannaanbax/C
baraarug/B
barakac/E
bar/B
barbaari/AT
bax/C
bedel/c
beer/BK
biiri/A
bilaab/B
bixi/AT
boob/B
boogaadi/AT
burburi/AST
buri/A
buug/E
buuxi/AT
caashaq/E
caawi/AS
cabaad/C
cab/BU
cabir/B
cabsii/A
cadaab/B
cadaadi/AT
caddeey/A
cadeey/A
cafi/A
carar/B
casuun/B
cayaar/B
celceli/A
celi/AT
ceyri/AT
ciqaab/B
ciriiri/A
ciyaar/B
C/qaadir
C/rashiid
cun/BU
daabac/b
daadi/AT
daah/C
daaq/E
daar/B
dabaq/E
dabar/B
dabool/c
dagaallan/B
dag/B
dalab/B
damac/C
dambeey/A
danbeey/A
dar/B
dardaaran/BK
dareen/B
dareensii/A
dayax/E
deey/A
deg/B
deji/AT
dhaadhici/A
dhaaf/B
dhaafi/AT
dhaawacan/B
dhaawac/C
dhac/C
dhal/cg
dhali/A
dhammaad/C
dhammeey/A
dhaqaaji/A
dhaqaaq/C
dhaqdhaqaaq/E
dharbaax/C
dhawaaq/CE
dhaweey/A
dhaxeey/A
dhexdhexaadi/AT
dhib/BK
dhig/B
dhiib/B
dhinac/E
dhis/B
dhoof/B
dhoofi/AT
dhoweey/A
dibadbax/C
dibudhac/E
dig/B
diid/d
dil/cK
dir/B
dirir/B
doon/B
doox/C
duceey/A
dulmi/AG
dumi/AT
duqeey/A
dur/B
duub/B
eeg/B
faafi/A
faahfaahi/AT
fac/E
fadhi/AG
fahan/B
farageli/A
fasax/C
fashil/B
fasir/B
fidi/AT
fiiri/A
fikir/BK
fisir/B
fogeey/A
fududeey/A
fuli/A
fur/B
fuul/c
gaabi/A
gaadh/B
gaadhsii/A
gaar/B
gaarsii/AT
gabagabeey/A
gab/B
gad/C
gal/c
ganaax/C
garaac/b/E
garansii/A
gawrac/CE
geey/A
geli/A
gowrac/CE
gub/B
gudbi/AT
gur/B
guur/B
guureey/A
habaar/B
habeey/A
hadal/cK
hagaag/B
hagaaji/AT
hagar/BT
halgan/BK
hanjab/B
hanuun/B
hawlgab/B
hel/c
heshii/A
hiili/A
hirgeli/A
hogaami/A
hordhac/CE
hordhig/B
horeey/A
horgeey/A
horkac/b
hormar/B
hormari/A
hortag/B
horukac/CE
horumari/AT
howlgab/B
hubi/A
hunqaac/C
hur/B
huri/A
iibi/AT
ilaali/A
imtixaan/B
irsaaq/C
iskudar/B
iskuday/C
islaam/BK
istaag/B
isticmaal/c/K
ixtiraam/B
jab/B
jajab/B
jajabi/A
jarjar/B
jawaab/BT
jebi/A
jeedi/A
jeex/C
jibi/A
jil/c
jixinjix/C
joog/B
jooji/A
kaadi/A
kab/B
kac/C
kari/AT
keen/B
khamaar/B
khasab/B
khilaaf/BK
kibir/BK
kici/A
koob/B
kor/B
kordhi/A
kori/A
kormeer/BK
kululeey/A
kuur/B
laab/B
layaab/B
lis/B
lumi/A
maareey/A
magac/E
mahadi/A
mamnuuc/C
maqal/c
marar/B
mar/BK
mari/A
marmar/B
marooji/A
marsii/A
mashquul/c
mashquuli/A
mashruuc/E
maslax/C
meelkadhac/E
midabeey/A
miir/B
muuji/A
nadiifi/AT
nax/C
ogeysii/A
oog/B
qaad/d
qaangaar/B
qabanqaabi/AT
qab/BT
qabooji/A
qafaal/c
qalaanqal/c
qal/c
qanci/A
qandici/A
qari/A
qarxi/AT
qasaar/B
qas/B
qax/C
qaybi/A
qayli/A
qeybi/A
qir/B
qor/B
qufac/CE
qurac/E
quus/B
raac/b
raaci/A
raadi/A
rar/B
reeb/B
rid/d
riix/C
rog/B
rux/C
saamax/C
saar/BK
sabar/B
safar/B
safr/B
saluug/B
sameey/A
sax/C
saxiix/C
seeg/B
seexi/AT
shaqeey/A
sharax/C
sheeg/B
shir/B/K
shub/B
sifeey/A
sii/AT
siib/B
socodsii/A
taag/B
taageer/B
tababar/B
tag/B
takoor/B
tali/A
tanaasul/c
taqasus/B
tebi/A
tijaabi/A
tilmaam/B
tir/B
tiri/A
tirtir/B
toos/B
tus/B
tuur/B
ururi/A
uruuri/A
wadaag/B
wad/d
wanaaji/A
war/BK
wareeji/A
wareeri/A
wari/A
warwareeg/B
waxtar/B
waydii/A
weerar/B
wer/B
weydii/A
xaar/B
xaqiiji/A
xidhiidh/B
xir/B
xiriir/B/K
xooji/A
xul/c
xus/BK
yaab/B
yeel/c
yeer/B
